Utah statutes.
15-10-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Automatic renewal provision" means a provision under which a service contract is renewed for one or more specified periods if:

(a)  the renewal causes the service contract to be in effect more than six months after the day of the initiation of the service contract; and

(b)  the renewal is effective unless the consumer gives notice to the seller of the consumer's intention to terminate the service contract.

(2)  "Business consumer" means a person engaged in business if the person enters into a service contract as part of the person's business activities.

(3) (a) "Consumer" means a person receiving service, maintenance, or repair under a service contract.

(b)  "Consumer" includes a representative of an association subject to:

(i)  Title 57, Chapter 8, Condominium Ownership Act; or

(ii)  Title 57, Chapter 8a, Community Association Act.

(4)  "Seller" means a person providing service, maintenance, or repair under a service contract.

(5) (a)  "Service contract" means a contract for service, maintenance, or repair:

(i)  in connection with real property; or

(ii)  that provides a benefit to the real property.

(b)  "Service contract" does not include a contract affecting any right, title, estate, or interest in real property, including:

(i)  a fee title interest;

(ii)  a leasehold interest;

(iii)  an option contract relating to real property;

(iv)  a real estate purchase contract;

(v)  an easement; or

(vi)  any other real property interest governed by Title 57, Real Estate.



Amended by Chapter 262, 2011 General Session

